Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6837
Emergency medical condition, defined.

Emergency medical condition means a medical or behavioral condition, the onset of which is sudden, that manifests itself by symptoms of sufficient severity, including, but not limited to, severe pain, that a prudent layperson, possessing an average knowledge of medicine and health, could reasonably expect the absence of immediate medical attention to result in (1) placing the health of the person afflicted with such condition in serious jeopardy or, in the case of a behavioral condition, placing the health of such persons or others in serious jeopardy, (2) serious impairment to such person's bodily functions, (3) serious impairment of any bodily organ or part of such person, or (4) serious disfigurement of such person.

Laws 2020, LB997, § 4.